Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,133
Fee waiver policy.

Each governing body shall establish a policy waiving the fees and providing the items otherwise required to be provided by students pursuant to subdivision (1) of section 79-2,127 for students who qualify for free or reduced-price lunches under United States Department of Agriculture child nutrition programs. Participation in a free-lunch program or reduced-price lunch program is not required to qualify for free or reduced-price lunches for purposes of this section.

Each governing body may establish a policy for waiving fees or providing items otherwise required to be provided by students in other circumstances.

Laws 2002, LB 1172, § 9;

Laws 2003, LB 249, § 9.